New York, session 2025-2026, S1768.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "drag 2 racing and speeding enforcement act". 3 § 2. Section 1182 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding 4 a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 5 3. In addition to the fine and/or imprisonment imposed by subdivisions 6 one and two of this section, every person convicted of a violation of 7 this section shall be subject to a penalty in the form of five points 8 against such person's drivers license. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 10 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04269-01-5